src/fst/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, á (->) Á, ä (->) Ä, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D,
e (->) E, é (->) É, ë (->) Ë, f (->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H,
i (->) I, í (->) Í, ï (->) Ï, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, ó (->) Ó, ö (->) Ö, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T,
u (->) U, ú (->) Ú, ü (->) Ü, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z
|| .#. _ ;
